Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Substance Abuse Prevention

12.330.
Kentucky Agency for Substance Abuse Policy (KY-ASAP) — Organization — Purpose — Members of KY-ASAP Board — Duties of board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

12.332.
Duties of KY-ASAP — Authority for administrative regulations — Reports. [Repealed and reenacted.]

12.334.
County tobacco addiction and alcohol and substance abuse advisory and coordination boards — Role of KY-ASAP — Local long-term community strategy. [Repealed and reenacted.]

12.350.
Office of Child Abuse and Domestic Violence Services. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

12.354.
Issuance of state professional license or certification to military service member or veteran — Qualification — Guidelines — Limitations.

As used in this section, “administrative body” has the same meaning as in KRS

12.010

.

Each administrative body that issues a license, permit, certificate, or other document that is required to operate within any business, profession, or occupation in the Commonwealth may issue a license, permit, certificate, or other document, or a temporary license, permit, certificate, or other document to a United States military service member or veteran who is seeking a license, permit, certificate, or other document under this section and has:

Separated from the military with an honorable discharge, discharge under honorable conditions, or a general discharge under honorable conditions within two (2) years preceding the date of applying for the license, permit, certificate, or other document;

Received training, education, or experience during active, National Guard, or federal reserve military service to the extent that such training, education, or experience satisfies the requirements established by law and administrative regulations of the respective board for the issuance of any license, permit, certificate, or other document, however styled or denominated, required for the practice of any business, profession, or occupation in the Commonwealth; and

Submitted his or her DD214 form or other proof of satisfactory completion of military training to the administrative body as part of the license or certificate application.

Nothing in subsection (2) of this section shall require an administrative body to issue a license, permit, certificate, or other document if the administrative body determines that the military training or experience does not meet the requirements established by the administrative body for the issuance of a license, permit, certificate, or other document to operate within a business, profession, or occupation in the Commonwealth.

Administrative bodies that receive multiple requests under this section are directed to publish clear guidelines to clarify requirements. These guidelines may be published electronically, in print, or by the promulgation of administrative regulations.

Military training and experience submitted under subsection (2) of this section shall not be used as a substitute or in lieu of:

A postsecondary school degree when a degree is a prerequisite for a license, permit, certificate, or other document; or

A specified examination when passage of an examination is a prerequisite for a license, permit, certificate, or other document.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 60, § 1, effective June 28, 2017.